Idaho, session 2025, S1140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-103. DEFINITIONS -- B. (1) "Base technical concept" means the
project specific concepts and technical information provided in the request
for proposals upon on which design-build firms will develop their technical
and price proposals.
(2) "Benefit primarily motor vehicles" and "primary benefit of motor
vehicles" means designing highway and bridge maintenance and construction
projects to reduce traffic congestion, travel delays, engine idle time, and
unproductive fuel consumption.
(2) (3) "Best value selection" means any selection process in which
proposals contain both price and qualitative components and award is based
upon on a combination of price and qualitative considerations.
(3) (4) "Board" means the Idaho transportation board.
(4) (5) "Business" means any lawful activity, excepting a farm opera-
tion, conducted primarily for the purchase, resale, lease and rental of per-
sonal and real property, and for the manufacture, processing or marketing
of products, commodities, or other personal property; for the sale of ser-
vices to the public; or solely for the purpose of section 40-2004(1), Idaho
Code, for assisting in the purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, process-
ing, or marketing of products, commodities, personal property, or services
by the erection and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display or dis-
plays, whether or not displays are located on the premises on which any of the
activities are conducted.
(5) (6) "Business entity" means a corporation, professional corpora-
tion, limited liability company, professional limited liability company,
general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership,
professional limited liability partnership or any other form of business ex-
cept a sole proprietorship.
SECTION 2. That Section 40-117, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


40-117. DEFINITIONS -- P. (1) "Person" includes every natural per-
son, firm, fiduciary, copartnership, association, corporation, trustee,
receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(2) "Place." (See "Maintain," section 40-114, Idaho Code)
(3) "Preliminary design," as used in section 40-904, Idaho Code, means
the general project location and design concepts. It includes, but is not
limited to, preliminary engineering and other activities and analyses,
such as environmental assessments, topographic surveys, metes and bounds
surveys, geotechnical investigations, hydrologic analyses, hydraulic
analyses, utility engineering, traffic studies, financial plans, revenue
estimates, hazardous materials assessments, general estimates of the types
and quantities of materials and other work needed to establish parameters
for the final design.
(4) "Price proposal" means the price submitted by a design-build
firm to provide the required design and construction services described
in the request for proposals or the price submitted by a construction man-
ager/general contractor firm to provide the required construction services
described in the request for proposal.
(5) "Primary benefit of motor vehicles" and "benefit primarily motor
vehicles" means designing highway and bridge maintenance and construction
projects to reduce traffic congestion, travel delays, engine idle time, and
unproductive fuel consumption. "Primary benefit of motor vehicles" also
includes and is limited to improving vehicle traffic flow and travel times
through expanding vehicle travel lanes, improving intersection efficiency,
adding turning lanes, improving transportation management systems, or a
combination of such methods. Highway improvements to existing or new bi-
cycle and pedestrian facilities may only be included in a project for the
primary benefit of motor vehicles if such facilities:
(a) Provide a collateral or secondary benefit to the project; or
(b) Are highway design improvements that are necessary to comply with
existing federal law.
(5) (6) "Primary system" or "primary highway" means any portion of the
highways of the state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so
designated, by the Idaho transportation board, and approved by the secretary
of transportation, pursuant to the provisions of title 23, U.S. Code, "High-
ways."
(6) (7) "Public highway agency" means the state transportation depart-
ment, any city, county, highway district or other political subdivision of
the state with jurisdiction over public highway systems and public rights-
of-way.
(7) (8) "Public highways" means all highways open to public use in the
state, whether maintained by the state or by any county, highway district,
city, or other political subdivision. (Also see "Highways," section 40-109,
Idaho Code)
(8) (9) "Public land survey corner" means any point actually estab-
lished and monumented in an original survey or resurvey that determines the
boundaries of remaining public lands, or public lands patented, represented
on an official plat and in the field notes thereof, accepted and approved un-
der authority delegated by congress to the United States general land office
and the United States department of interior, bureau of land management.


(9) (10) "Public right-of-way" means a right-of-way open to the public
and under the jurisdiction of a public highway agency, where the public high-
way agency has no obligation to construct or maintain, but may expend funds
for the maintenance of, said public right-of-way or post traffic signs for
vehicular traffic on said public right-of-way. In addition, a public right-
of-way includes a right-of-way which was originally intended for develop-
ment as a highway and was accepted on behalf of the public by deed of pur-
chase, fee simple title, authorized easement, eminent domain, by plat, pre-
scriptive use, or abandonment of a highway pursuant to section 40-203, Idaho
Code, but shall not include federal land rights-of-way, as provided in sec-
tion 40-204A, Idaho Code, that resulted from the creation of a facility for
the transmission of water. Public rights-of-way shall not be considered im-
proved highways for the apportionment of funds from the highway distribution
account.
(10) (11) "Public street" means a road, thoroughfare, alley, highway or
bridge under the jurisdiction of a public highway agency.
(11) (12) "Public transportation services" means, but is not limited
to, fixed transit routes, scheduled or unscheduled transit services pro-
vided by motor vehicle, bus, rail, van, aerial tramway and other modes of
public conveyance; paratransit service for the elderly and disabled; shut-
tle and commuter service between cities, counties, health care facilities,
employment centers, educational institutions or park-and-ride locations;
subscription van and car pooling services; transportation services unique
to social service programs; and the management and administration thereof.
SECTION 3. That Section 40-207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-207. VIOLATIONS -- PENALTIES. Any elected official, officer, or
person who shall violate or aid in the violation of any of the provisions
of this title, unless a different penalty is prescribed by law, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof be punished by a fine
of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dollars ($1,000),
or imprisonment for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days, or by both such
fine and imprisonment. The reporting of violations under this title shall be
afforded protection pursuant to the provisions of chapter 21, title 6, Idaho
Code. All fines collected for violations of the provisions of this title
shall be paid into the highway distribution account established in section
40-701, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.